Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-530
Enlarged district; power to alter city sewers connecting with drainage district sewers.

Such enlarged sanitary drainage district shall have power to take charge of, reconstruct, divert, alter or disconnect any main line sewer in any municipality, city or village, or unite the same with the sewerage system of the district, or to use any appropriate means deemed necessary by the trustees of the district to establish and maintain proper and adequate sanitary and sewerage systems for the district.

Laws 1919, c. 240, § 7, p. 1002;

C.S.1922, § 1886;

C.S.1929, § 31-624;

R.S.1943, § 31-530.